Maryland, session 2025, SB0177.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–136.
(A) (1) IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 12–107(B) OF THE STATE FINANCE AND
PROCUREMENT ARTICLE, THE DEPARTMENT, WITHOUT THE APPROVAL OF ANY
OTHER PRIMARY PROCUREMENT UNIT, MAY THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ESTABLISH A
PROGRAM, WHEN FUNDING IS AVAILABLE, TO ENGAGE IN OR CONTROL
PROCUREMENT OF LOCAL FOOD FOR LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEMS.:
(1) FOOD GROWN WITHIN A 200–MILE RADIUS FROM AN ELEMENTARY
OR SECONDARY SCHOOL FOR WHICH A LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM ENTERS INTO A
MASTER CONTRACT WITH THE DEPARTMENT;
(2) FOOD GROWN AT A CERTIFIED LOCAL FARM UNDER § 14–701 OF
THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE; AND
(3) CERTIFIED CHESAPEAKE INVASIVE SPECIES PROVIDED BY A
CERTIFIED CHESAPEAKE INVASIVE SPECIES PROVIDER AS DEFINED IN § 14–701 OF
THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE
(2) THE PROGRAM SHALL PROCURE PRODUCTS THAT ARE:
(I) FOODS GROWN AT A CERTIFIED LOCAL FARM, AS DEFINED
IN § 14–701 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE;

SENATE BILL 177 3
(II) CERTIFIED CHESAPEAKE INVASIVE SPECIES PROVIDED BY
A CERTIFIED CHESAPEAKE INVASIVE SPECIES PROVIDER, AS DEFINED IN § 14–701
OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE; AND
(III) FOODS GROWN WITHIN A 250–MILE RADIUS FROM AN
ELEMENTARY OR SECONDARY SCHOOL IN THE STATE.
(3) THE PROGRAM SHALL GIVE PREFERENCE TO PROVIDERS
QUALIFYING UNDER PARAGRAPH (2)(I) AND (II) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(B) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL COORDINATE WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF
AGRICULTURE, THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL SERVICES, AND ANY OTHER
RELEVANT UNIT OF STATE GOVERNMENT TO ESTABLISH THE PROGRAM, INCLUDING
A CENTRALIZED PLATFORM TO ENCOURAGE THE PARTICIPATION OF FARMERS AND
DISTRIBUTORS IN PROCUREMENT OPPORTUNITIES IN ACCORDANCE WITH
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION.
(C) SUBJECT TO § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE
DEPARTMENT SHALL REPORT TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY ON OR BEFORE
DECEMBER 1 EACH YEAR ON THE TOTAL NUMBER AND DOLLAR VALUE OF MASTER
CONTRACTS IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION WITH:
(1) LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEMS;
(2) CERTIFIED LOCAL FARMS; AND
(3) CERTIFIED CHESAPEAKE INVASIVE SPECIES PROVIDERS
PROCUREMENT CONTRACTS FOR LOCAL FOOD AT LOCAL SCHOOLS, INCLUDING THE
NUMBER OF THESE CONTRACTS THAT ARE WITH CERTIFIED LOCAL FARMS OR
CERTIFIED CHESAPEAKE INVASIVE SPECIES PROVIDERS.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
12–101.
(a) This section does not apply to:
(1) capital expenditures by the Department of Transportation or the
Maryland Transportation Authority, in connection with State roads, bridges, or highways,
as provided in § 12–202 of this title; [or]
(2) procurements by the Department of General Services for the purpose of
modernizing cybersecurity infrastructure for the State valued below $1,000,000; OR

SENATE BILL 177
(3) PROCUREMENTS BY THE STATE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION
FOR THE PURPOSE OF MASTER CONTRACTING AS DEFINED IN § 13–101 OF THIS
ARTICLE.
12–107.
(b) Subject to the authority of the Board, jurisdiction over procurement is as
follows:
(2) the Department of General Services may:
(ix) coordinate with governmental entities and local entities to
maximize use of intergovernmental purchasing agreements established in accordance with
§ 13–110 of this article, INCLUDING WORKING WITH THE STATE DEPARTMENT OF
EDUCATION TO PROCURE LOCAL FOOD FOR LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEMS IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 7–136 OF THE EDUCATION ARTICLE;
(4) the Maryland Port Commission, without the approval of any of the
other primary procurement units, may engage in the procurement of:
(i) supplies for port related activities, including motor vehicles and
information processing supplies, but excluding:
1. supplies funded by the proceeds from State general
obligation bonds; and
2. insurance;
(ii) services for port related activities, including information
processing services, but excluding banking and financial services under the authority of the
State Treasurer under item (1) of this subsection;
(iii) construction and construction related services for a port facility
as defined in § 6–101(e) of the Transportation Article;
(iv) port related architectural and engineering services under Title
13, Subtitle 3 of this article; and
(v) leases of real property for port related activities unless the lease
payments are from the General Fund of the State; [and]
(5) the Department of General Services, without the approval of any other
primary procurement unit, may engage in or control procurement of:
(i) information processing equipment, cloud computing equipment,
and associated services, as provided in Title 3.5, Subtitle 3 of this article;

SENATE BILL 177 5
(ii) information technology system modernization, as provided in
Title 3.5, Subtitle 3 of this article;
(iii) telecommunication equipment, systems, or services, as provided
in Title 3.5, Subtitle 4 of this article; and
(iv) cybersecurity upgrades and modernization, as provided in Title
3.5, Subtitle 3 of this article; AND
(6) THE STATE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION, WITHOUT THE
APPROVAL OF ANY OTHER PRIMARY PROCUREMENT UNIT, MAY ENGAGE IN OR
CONTROL PROCUREMENT OF:
(I) FOOD GROWN WITHIN A 200–MILE RADIUS FROM AN
ELEMENTARY OR SECONDARY SCHOOL FOR WHICH A LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM
ENTERS INTO A MASTER CONTRACT WITH THE STATE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION;
(II) FOOD GROWN AT A CERTIFIED LOCAL FARM UNDER § 14–701
OF THIS ARTICLE; AND
(III) CERTIFIED CHESAPEAKE INVASIVE SPECIES PROVIDED BY
A CERTIFIED CHESAPEAKE INVASIVE SPECIES PROVIDER AS DEFINED IN § 14–701
OF THIS ARTICLE.
13–101.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Designated procurement unit” means:
(1) the Department of General Services;
(2) the Department of Transportation; [or]
(3) the Department of Information Technology, only with respect to an
information technology master contract executed before July 1, 2022, until the earlier of:
(i) the expiration date of all information technology master
contracts; or
(ii) June 30, 2027; OR
(4) THE STATE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION, ONLY WITH RESPECT
TO A MASTER CONTRACT RELATED TO LOCAL FOOD.

SENATE BILL 177
(e) “Master contracting” means a streamlined procurement method that provides
for the qualification of bidders and offerors for the procurement of services, supplies, or
commodities.
13–113.
(a) (1) The designated procurement units may adopt master contracting, a
streamlined procurement method, to provide for the qualification of an offeror in one or
more categories of services, supplies, or commodities.
(2) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY REQUIREMENTS OF A LOCAL SCHOOL
SYSTEM, THE STATE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION MAY NOT REQUIRE
CERTIFICATION FOR GOOD AGRICULTURAL PRACTICES FOR MASTER CONTRACTING.
14–407.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Locally grown food” means food grown [in the State] AT A CERTIFIED
LOCAL FARM DEFINED IN § 14–701 OF THIS TITLE.
(3) “Percentage price preference” means the percent by which a responsive
bid from a responsible bidder whose product is a locally grown food may exceed the lowest
responsive bid submitted by a responsible bidder whose product is not a locally grown food.
(b) (1) The Board shall adopt regulations that require State schools and
facilities to establish a percentage price preference, not to exceed [5%] 10%, for the
purchase of locally grown food.
(2) NOTWITHSTANDING PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
BOARD SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS AUTHORIZING STATE SCHOOLS AND
FACILITIES TO CONDUCT AN INDIVIDUAL PROCUREMENT THAT IS LIMITED TO
RESPONSES FROM CERTIFIED LOCAL FARMS AS DEFINED IN § 14–701 OF THIS TITLE.
(c) A percentage price preference under this section may not be used in
conjunction with any other percentage price preference established under this title.
(d) Each State school and facility shall review the procurement specifications
currently used and, to the extent practicable, require the use of a percentage price
preference in their purchase of locally grown food.
(e) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, this section is
broadly applicable to all procurements by State schools and facilities if the locally grown
food is consistent with the requirements of the bid specification.

SENATE BILL 177 7
(2) Only to the extent necessary to prevent the denial of federal money or
eliminate the inconsistency with federal law, this section does not apply to a procurement
by a State school or facility if it is determined that compliance with this section would:
(i) cause denial of federal money; or
(ii) be inconsistent with the requirements of federal law.
14–701.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Certified Chesapeake invasive species” means a finfish species that is:
(1) ranked as high priority in the Maryland Aquatic Nuisance Species
Management Plan; and
(2) harvested from the Chesapeake Bay or its tributaries.
(c) “Certified Chesapeake invasive species provider” means a person licensed and
authorized as a seafood dealer under § 4–701 of the Natural Resources Article that:
(1) is certified by the Department in accordance with regulations adopted
under this subtitle; and
(2) can demonstrate that the person’s product is a certified Chesapeake
invasive species.
(d) “Certified local farm” means a local farm enterprise that:
(1) meets the nutrient management requirements established under Title
8, Subtitle 8 of the Agriculture Article; and
(2) is certified by the Department in accordance with regulations adopted
under this subtitle.
14–702.
(a) (1) There is an Office for the Certified Local Farm and Fish Program in the
Department.
(2) The purpose of the Office is to administer the Program and facilitate
the participation of certified local farms and certified Chesapeake invasive species
providers in the Program.
(b) (1) There is a Certified Local Farm and Fish Program in the Office.

SENATE BILL 177
(2) The purpose of the Program is to encourage each unit to try to achieve
an overall percentage goal of 20% of the unit’s total dollar value of procurement contracts
for food from certified local farms and certified Chesapeake invasive species providers.
(c) The Department shall create two positions to provide staff for the Office.
(D) THE DEPARTMENT, ALONG WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
SERVICES, SHALL COORDINATE WITH THE STATE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION TO
PROCURE LOCAL FOOD FOR LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEMS IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 7–136
OF THE EDUCATION ARTICLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.